Washington statutes.
RCW 19.149.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter:

(1) "Lender" means any person doing business under the laws of this state or the United States relating to banks, savings banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, credit unions, consumer loan companies, insurance companies, real estate investment trusts as defined in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 856 and the affiliates, subsidiaries, and service corporations thereof, and all other persons who make residential mortgage loans.

(2) "Residential mortgage loan" means any loan used for the purchase of a single-family dwelling or multiple-family dwelling of four or less units secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on the residential real estate.

[ 1994 c 295 s 1.]